Texas statutes.
FINANCE CODE

TITLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 1.001. PURPOSE OF CODE. (a) This code is enacted as a part of the state's continuing statutory revision program, begun by the Texas Legislative Council in 1963 as directed by the legislature in the law codified as Section 323.007, Government Code. The program contemplates a topic-by-topic revision of the state's general and permanent statute law without substantive change.

(b) Consistent with the objectives of the statutory revision program, the purpose of this code is to make the law encompassed by this code more accessible and understandable by:

(1) rearranging the statutes into a more logical order;

(2) employing a format and numbering system designed to facilitate citation of the law and to accommodate future expansion of the law;

(3) eliminating repealed, duplicative, unconstitutional, expired, executed, and other ineffective provisions; and

(4) restating the law in modern American English to the greatest extent possible.

Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1008, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 1.002. CONSTRUCTION OF CODE. Chapter 311, Government Code (Code Construction Act), applies to the construction of each provision in this code except as otherwise expressly provided by this code.

Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1008, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 1.003. REFERENCE IN LAW TO STATUTE REVISED BY CODE. A reference in a law to a statute or a part of a statute revised by this code is considered to be a reference to the part of this code that revises that statute or part of that statute.

Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1008, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 1.004. PREEMPTION. (a) Unless expressly authorized by another statute and except as provided by Subsection (b), a municipality or county may not adopt, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, order, or rule regulating conduct in a field of regulation that is occupied by a provision of this code. An ordinance, order, or rule that violates this section is void, unenforceable, and inconsistent with this code.

(b) A municipality or county may enforce or maintain an ordinance, order, or rule regulating any conduct under Chapter 393 and any conduct related to a credit services organization, as defined by Section 393.001 or by any other provision of this code, or a credit access business, as defined by Section 393.601 or by any other provision of this code, if:

(1) the municipality or county adopted the ordinance, order, or rule before January 1, 2023; and

(2) the ordinance, order, or rule would have been valid under the law as it existed before the date this section was enacted.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 899 (H.B. 2127), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2023.